apertium-lif.lif.lexd
LEXICON Cases
<nom​>:>ᤒᤧ
<nom>:>ᤒᤣ
<gen>:>{NG}{A}{n}
<gen​>:>ᤖᤧ              # Dir/LR
<gen​>:>ᤗᤧ              # Dir/LR
<gen>:>{l}ᤗᤧ           # Dir/LR
<gen>:>{ie}{l}ᤗᤧ       # Dir/LR
<gen>:>{a}{ie}{l}ᤗᤧ    # Dir/LR
<gen>:>ᤖᤣ              # Dir/LR
<gen>:>ᤗᤣ              # Dir/LR
<gen>:>{l}ᤗᤣ           # Dir/LR
<gen>:>{ie}{l}ᤗᤣ       # Dir/LR
<gen>:>{a}{ie}{l}ᤗᤣ    # Dir/LR
<voc>:>{aa}{o}
<voc>:>{ana}{e}       # Dir/LR
<voc>:>ᤖᤧ              # Dir/LR
<voc>:>ᤖᤣ              # Dir/LR
<imp>:>{Ee}
<loc>:>{aa}{oo}
<med>:>ᤗᤠ{m}
<ela>:>{aa}{oo}ᤏᤢ
<ela>:>{aa}{oo}ᤗᤠ{m}       # Dir/LR
<all>:>ᤌᤠᤰ
<all>:>ᤎᤠᤰ             # Dir/LR
<itrt>:>ᤗᤢᤔᤥ
<itrt>:>ᤗᤢᤶᤔᤥ          # Dir/LR
<comp>:>ᤏᤢ{do}{l}ᤗᤧ
<comp>:>ᤏᤢ{do}{l}ᤗᤣ    # Dir/LR
<com>:>ᤏᤢ{ng}
<com>:>ᤏᤢ              # Dir/LR
<abl>:>ᤗᤠ{m}
<abl>:>ᤏᤢ{ng}          # Dir/LR
<erg>:>ᤖᤧ
<erg>:>ᤗᤧ              # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{l}ᤗᤧ           # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{ie}{l}ᤗᤧ       # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{a}{ie}{l}ᤗᤧ    # Dir/LR
<erg>:>ᤖᤣ              # Dir/LR
<erg>:>ᤗᤣ              # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{l}ᤗᤣ           # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{ie}{l}ᤗᤣ       # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{a}{ie}{l}ᤗᤣ    # Dir/LR
<abs>:>{MNG}{Iabs}{N}
<abs>:>{MNG}{EGS}{N}  # Dir/LR
<abs​>:>{N}            # Dir/LR
<ins>:>ᤗᤧ
<ins>:>{l}ᤗᤧ           # Dir/LR
<ins>:>{i}{l}ᤗᤧ        # Dir/LR
<ins>:>ᤗᤣ              # Dir/LR
<ins>:>{l}ᤗᤣ           # Dir/LR
<ins>:>{i}{l}ᤗᤣ        # Dir/LR

ALIAS Cases Cases2

LEXICON Ergation
<erg>:>ᤖᤧ
<erg>:>ᤗᤧ              # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{l}ᤗᤧ           # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{ie}{l}ᤗᤧ       # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{a}{ie}{l}ᤗᤧ    # Dir/LR
<erg>:>ᤖᤣ              # Dir/LR
<erg>:>ᤗᤣ              # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{l}ᤗᤣ           # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{ie}{l}ᤗᤣ       # Dir/LR
<erg>:>{a}{ie}{l}ᤗᤣ    # Dir/LR

LEXICON Attr
<attr>:

LEXICON Subord
<sub>:>{ie}{l}ᤗᤧ
<sub>:>{l}ᤗᤧ           # Dir/LR
<sub>:>ᤗᤧ              # Dir/LR
<sub​>:>ᤗᤠ{do}ᤃᤡ

LEXICON Imperious
<def>:>{E}{N}

LEXICON Nominalizer
<nom>:>{Bb}{A}

LEXICON Comparative
<comp>:>ᤏᤢ{do}{l}ᤗᤧ
<comp>:>ᤏᤢ{do}{l}ᤗᤣ    # Dir/LR

LEXICON Collectivity
<cnt>:>{BH}{u}

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON Pronouns
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><sg>:ᤀᤠᤱᤃᤠ{gs}
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><sg>:ᤅᤠ              # Dir/LR
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><sg>:ᤀᤡᤱᤃᤠ{gs}         # Dir/LR
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><du><incl>:ᤀᤠᤴᤇᤡ{gs}
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><du><excl>:ᤀᤠᤴᤇᤡ>ᤃᤧ
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><du><excl>:ᤀᤠᤴᤇᤡ>ᤃᤩᤠ    # Dir/LR
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><du><excl>:ᤀᤠᤴᤇᤡᤅᤠ     # Dir/LR
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><pl><incl>:ᤀᤠᤏᤡ{gs}
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><pl><excl>:ᤀᤠᤏᤡ>ᤃᤧ
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><pl><excl>:ᤀᤠᤏᤡ>ᤃᤣ     # Dir/LR
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><pl><excl>:ᤀᤠᤏᤡ>ᤃᤩᤠ     # Dir/LR
ᤀᤠ<prn><pers><p1><pl><excl>:ᤀᤠᤏᤡᤅᤠ      # Dir/LR

ᤂᤧᤏᤧ<prn><pers><p2><sg>:ᤂᤧᤏᤧ{gs}
ᤂᤧᤴᤆᤡ<prn><pers><p2><du>:ᤂᤧᤴᤇᤡ
ᤂᤧᤏᤡ<prn><pers><p2><pl>:ᤂᤧᤏᤡ{gs}
ᤂᤡᤏᤡ<prn><pers><p2><pl>:ᤂᤡᤏᤡ{gs}        # Dir/LR
ᤁᤴ<prn><pers><p3><sg>:ᤁᤴ
ᤂᤢᤏᤧ<prn><pers><p3><mf><sg>:ᤂᤢᤏᤧ{gs}
ᤂᤧᤱ<prn><pers><p3><nt><sg>:ᤂᤧᤱ
ᤂᤢᤴᤆᤡ<prn><pers><p3><du>:ᤂᤢᤴᤇᤡ
ᤂᤧᤱᤜᤠ<prn><pers><p3><pl>:ᤂᤧᤱᤜᤠ
ᤂᤢᤏᤡ<prn><pers><p3><pl>:ᤂᤢᤏᤡ{gs}        # Dir/LR
ᤂᤢᤴᤆᤡ<prn><pers><p3><nonsg>:ᤂᤢᤴᤇᤡ{gs}   # Dir/LR
ᤂᤧᤱᤜᤠ<prn><pers><p3><nonsg>:ᤂᤧᤱᤜᤠ        # Dir/LR

LEXICON DemPrn
ᤂᤴ<prn><dem>:ᤂ{N}
ᤁᤴ<prn><dem>:ᤁ{N}
ᤂᤧᤴ<prn><dem>:ᤂᤧ{N}
ᤂᤧᤱ<prn><dem>:ᤂᤧ{ng} # Dir/LR
ᤁᤱ<prn><dem>:ᤁ{ng}

LEXICON DefPrn
ᤂᤴᤏᤧᤴ<prn><def>:ᤂᤴᤏ>{E}{N}

LEXICON IntPrn
ᤌᤣ<prn><itg>:ᤌᤣ
ᤌᤧᤔᤠ<prn><itg>:ᤌᤧᤔᤠ
ᤌᤣᤔᤠ<prn><itg>:ᤌᤣᤔᤠ
ᤜᤠᤔᤠ<prn><itg>:ᤜᤠᤔᤠ
ᤜᤣᤔᤠ<prn><itg>:ᤜᤣᤔᤠ
ᤜᤧᤴ<prn><itg>:ᤜᤧᤴ
ᤀᤣ᤺ᤴ<prn><itg>:ᤀᤣ᤺{N}
ᤀᤣᤏ᤻<prn><itg>:ᤀᤣᤏ᤻     # Dir/LR
ᤀᤣ᤺ᤸᤗᤣ<prn><itg>:ᤀᤣ᤺ᤸᤗᤣ
ᤀᤣᤗ᤻ᤗᤣ<prn><itg>:ᤀᤣᤗ᤻ᤗᤣ  # Dir/LR
ᤀᤠᤳᤋᤡ<prn><itg>:ᤀᤠᤳᤋᤡ
ᤀᤠᤳᤋᤡᤴ<prn><itg>:ᤀᤠᤳᤋᤡ{N} 

LEXICON IndPrn
ᤁᤢᤓᤠ<prn><ind>:ᤁᤢᤓᤠ

LEXICON ReflPrn
ᤀᤠᤒᤠᤅᤣ<prn><ref>:ᤀᤠᤒᤠ>ᤅᤣ

LEXICON Prepos-Stems
ᤌᤥ<pr>:ᤌᤥ
ᤏᤠ<pr>:ᤏ{A}
ᤀᤧᤶᤓᤧᤍᤠᤱᤒᤠ<pr>:ᤀᤧᤶᤓᤧᤍᤠᤱ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤗᤠᤃᤡ<pr>:ᤗᤠᤃᤡ
ᤑᤠ᤹ᤀᤠᤱ<pr>:ᤑᤠ᤹ᤀᤠ{ng}
ᤌᤠᤖᤡᤰ<pr>:ᤌᤠᤖᤡ{k}
ᤋᤃᤡ<pr>:ᤋᤃᤡ
ᤗᤧᤵᤔᤠᤱ<pr>:ᤗᤧᤵᤔᤠ{ng}
ᤁᤢᤛᤡᤱ<pr>:ᤁᤢᤛᤡ{ng}
ᤛᤥᤖᤡᤰ<pr>:ᤛᤥᤖᤡ{k}

LEXICON Postpos-Stems
ᤛᤡᤰᤋᤥ<post>:ᤛᤡᤰᤋᤥ
ᤀᤡᤛᤡᤰ<post>:ᤀᤡᤛᤡ{k}{do}
ᤀᤡᤛᤡᤁ᤻<post>:ᤀᤡᤛᤡᤁ{km}    # Dir/LR
ᤋᤃᤡ<post>:{T}ᤃ{I}
ᤋᤃᤡᤒᤠ<post>:{T}ᤃᤡ>ᤒ{Aabs}

LEXICON TopicMarker
ᤆᤀᤡᤲ<top>:ᤆᤀᤡᤲ
ᤁ<top>:ᤁ
ᤛᤧᤴ<top>:ᤛᤧ{N}

LEXICON Complementizer
ᤑᤧᤸᤗᤧ<comp>:{BH}{E}{l}ᤗᤧ

LEXICON Adjectives
ᤏᤢᤒᤠ<adj><m>:ᤏᤢ>ᤒ{A}
ᤏᤢ<adj>:ᤏᤢ
ᤀᤠᤰᤂᤣ<adj>:ᤀᤠᤰᤂ{eg}
ᤀ᤹ᤍ᤺ᤱ<adj>:ᤀ᤹ᤍ᤺{ng}
ᤆᤢᤰᤛᤠ<adj><dim>:ᤆᤢᤰ>ᤛ{A}
ᤂᤶᤍᤠᤱ<adj>:ᤂᤶᤍᤠ{ng}
ᤋᤠᤃᤧᤖᤠ<adj>:ᤋᤠᤃᤧᤖ{A}
ᤘᤣ᤹<adj>:ᤘᤣ{gs}
ᤗᤳᤇᤠ<adj>:ᤗᤳᤇ{A}
ᤕᤶᤒᤠ<adj><m>:ᤕᤶ>ᤒ{A}
ᤕᤖᤡᤰ<adj>:ᤕᤖᤡ{k}
ᤌᤣᤀᤠᤱ<adj>:ᤌᤣᤀᤠ{ng}
ᤜᤠᤱ<adj>:ᤜᤠ{ng}
ᤁᤢᤓᤠ<adj>:ᤁᤢᤓ{A}
ᤁᤠᤰ<adj>:ᤁᤠ{k}
ᤐᤕᤶ<adj>:ᤐᤕ{m}
ᤜᤧᤰᤋᤱᤒᤠ<adj><m>:ᤜᤧᤰᤋᤱ>ᤒ{A}

LEXICON CaseMarker
ᤋᤠᤵ<nom>:ᤋᤠ{p}
ᤖᤧ<erg>:ᤖᤧ
ᤗᤧ<erg>:ᤗᤧ        # Dir/LR

LEXICON Concession
ᤛᤠᤱ<concess>:ᤛᤠ{ng}

LEXICON Question-Particles
ᤀᤡ<qst>:{a}{I}
ᤀᤡ<qst>:{I}      # Dir/LR

LEXICON Determiners
ᤁᤧᤖᤧᤰ:ᤁᤧᤖᤧ{k}
ᤕᤸᤗᤡᤰ:ᤕᤸᤗᤡ{k}
ᤈᤶᤔ:ᤈᤶᤔ
ᤂ:ᤂ
ᤀᤖᤢ:ᤀᤖᤢ
ᤍᤠᤱᤒᤧᤸᤗᤧ:ᤍᤠᤱᤒᤧᤸᤗᤧ    #unsure
ᤍᤠᤱᤒᤠᤸᤗᤧ:ᤍᤠᤱᤒᤠᤸᤗᤧ    #unsure

LEXICON Ij-Stem
ᤛᤣᤘᤠᤖᤥ:ᤛᤣᤘᤠ>ᤖᤥ
ᤛᤧᤘᤠᤖᤥ:ᤛᤧᤘᤠ>ᤖᤥ
ᤔᤧ᤺ᤴ:ᤔᤧ᤺{N}
ᤗᤥ:ᤗᤥ
ᤛᤧᤘᤠ:ᤛᤧᤘᤠ

LEXICON Conjunctions
ᤋᤖ<cnjcoo>:ᤋᤖ
ᤑᤃᤖ<cnjsub>:ᤑᤃᤖ
ᤜᤧᤰᤁᤩᤠᤱ<cnjcoo>:ᤜᤧᤰᤁᤩᤠ{ng}
ᤁᤖ<cnj>:ᤁᤖ
ᤑᤠ᤹ᤀᤠᤱ<cnj>:ᤑᤠ᤹ᤀᤠ{ng}
ᤀᤡᤃᤪ<cnjcoo>:ᤀᤡᤃᤪ
ᤏᤢ<cnjcoo>:ᤏᤢ
ᤂᤧᤸᤗᤧ<cnjcoo>:ᤂᤧᤸᤗᤧ
ᤗᤢᤶᤔᤥ<cnj>:ᤗᤢᤶ>ᤔᤥ
ᤑᤠ᤹ᤃᤪ<cnjsub>:ᤑᤠ᤹ᤃᤪ

LEXICON Evidentiality
ᤗᤇ<evid>:ᤗᤇ
ᤖᤇ<evid>:ᤖᤇ

LEXICON EmphMarker
ᤏᤠ<emph>:ᤏᤠ

LEXICON AdverbStem
ᤂᤶᤓ:ᤂᤶᤓ
ᤂᤶᤓᤧ:ᤂᤶᤓᤧ           # Dir/LR
ᤂᤶᤓᤠ:ᤂᤶᤓᤠ           # Dir/LR
ᤀᤧᤶᤓᤧᤸᤗᤧ:ᤀᤧᤶᤓᤧᤸᤗᤧ
ᤕᤠᤶᤔᤢ:ᤕᤠᤶᤔᤢ
ᤕᤠᤶᤔᤥ:ᤕᤠᤶᤔᤥ          # Dir/LR
ᤖᤳ:ᤖ{t}
ᤀᤠᤱ:{a}{A}{ng}
ᤀᤠᤱ:{A}{ng}         # Dir/LR
ᤀᤠᤓᤣᤍᤠᤱᤒᤠ:ᤀᤠᤓᤣᤍᤠᤱᤒᤠ
ᤀᤠᤓᤣᤍᤠᤱ:ᤀᤠᤓᤣᤍᤠᤱ
ᤀᤠᤸᤗᤠ:ᤀᤠᤸᤗᤠ
ᤔᤧ᤺ᤴᤏ:ᤔᤧ᤺ᤴᤏ
ᤔᤧᤏ᤻ᤏ:ᤔᤧᤏ᤻ᤏ # Dir/LR
ᤌᤧᤕᤠ᤺ᤴᤍᤰ:ᤌᤧᤕᤠ᤺ᤴᤍ{k}
ᤌᤧᤕᤠᤏ᤻ᤍᤰ:ᤌᤧᤕᤠᤏ᤻ᤍ{k}     # Dir/LR
ᤀᤄᤡ:ᤀᤄᤡ
ᤂᤶᤓᤧᤸᤗᤧ:ᤂᤶᤓᤧᤸᤗᤧ
ᤀᤠᤓᤣ:ᤀᤠᤓᤣ
ᤀᤰᤂᤣ:ᤀᤰᤂᤣ
ᤏᤢᤖᤡᤰ:ᤏᤢᤖᤡ{k}
ᤀᤳᤋᤡ:ᤀᤳᤋᤡ
ᤜᤧᤰᤁᤩᤠᤱ:ᤜᤧᤰᤁᤩᤠ{ng}
ᤀᤠᤸᤗ:ᤀᤠᤸᤗ
ᤛᤠ᤹ᤖᤡᤰ:ᤛᤠ{gs}ᤖᤡ{k}
ᤆᤡ:ᤆᤡ
ᤜᤧᤰᤁᤧ:ᤜᤧᤰᤁᤧ{do}
ᤜᤧᤰᤁᤣ:ᤜᤧᤰᤁᤣ{do}  # Dir/LR
ᤌᤣᤀᤠᤱ:ᤌᤣᤀᤠ{ng}
ᤀᤣᤃᤠᤱ:ᤀᤣᤃᤠ{ng}
ᤀᤠᤳᤋᤡ:ᤀᤠᤳᤋᤡ
ᤛᤍᤣ:ᤛᤍᤣ
ᤛᤍᤠᤍᤡᤱ:ᤛᤍᤠᤍᤡ{ng}
ᤂᤧᤒᤩᤠᤱ:ᤂᤧᤒᤩᤠᤱ
ᤂᤧᤵᤔᤥ:ᤂᤧᤵᤔᤥ
ᤀᤠᤵᤑᤣᤰ:ᤀᤠᤵᤑᤣ{k}
ᤗ᤹ᤖᤡᤰ:ᤗ᤹ᤖᤡ{k}
ᤐᤕᤶ:ᤐᤕ{m}

ALIAS AdverbStem Adverbs2

LEXICON Verb-Stems
ᤀᤡᤶᤔᤠ<v>:ᤀᤡ{P}{S}
ᤗᤡᤶᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤡᤶ{D}
ᤛᤥ᤺ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤛᤥ᤺{S}
ᤖᤠ᤺ᤰᤔᤠ<v>:ᤖᤠ᤺ᤰ{s}
ᤖᤠᤁ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤖᤠᤁ᤻{s}              # Dir/LR
ᤗᤠᤁ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤠᤁ᤻{s}              # Dir/LR
ᤗᤠ᤺ᤰᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤠ᤺ᤰ{s}              # Dir/LR
ᤗᤠ᤺ᤰᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤠ᤺ᤰ{S}              # Dir/LR
ᤗᤠᤁ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤠᤁ᤻{S}              # Dir/LR
ᤐᤣ᤺ᤰᤔᤠ<v>:{B}{e}{do}{K}
ᤐᤣᤁ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:{B}{e}{K}{km}      # Dir/LR
ᤋᤠ᤺ᤔᤠ<v>:{T}{do}
ᤏᤡᤔᤠ<v>:ᤏᤡ{So}
ᤘᤠᤔᤠ<v>:ᤘ{ay}{gs}
ᤛᤧᤶᤔᤠ<v>:ᤛᤧ{do}{R}
ᤆᤥ᤺ᤰᤔᤠ<vbdo>:{ch}{oo}{do}{Kk}
ᤆᤥᤁ᤻ᤔᤠ<vbdo>:{ch}{K}{km}     # Dir/LR
ᤆᤠᤔᤠ<v>:ᤆ{ao}
ᤐᤥ᤺ᤱᤔᤠ<v>:{B}{oo}{do}{NGK}{KSo}
ᤐᤥᤅ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:{B}{oo}ᤅ{km}{KSo}  # Dir/LR
ᤐᤠ᤺ᤵᤔᤠ<v>:{B}{A}{do}{pgt}{R}
ᤐᤠᤐ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:{B}{A}ᤐ{km}{R}    # Dir/LR
ᤔᤠ᤺ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤔᤠ{do}{S}
ᤗ᤺ᤵᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗ᤺{tp}{tm}
ᤗᤐ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗ{t}{km}{tm}
ᤗ᤺ᤶᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗ{do}{NM}{Dnull}
ᤀᤢ᤺ᤵᤔᤠ<v>:ᤀᤢ{do}{tp}{tm}
ᤀᤢᤐ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤀᤢᤐ{km}{tm}        # Dir/LR
ᤑᤧ᤹ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤑᤧ{dg}{N}
ᤋᤧᤶᤔᤠ<v>:ᤋᤧ{t}
ᤋᤥ᤺ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤋᤥ{do}
ᤏᤠᤘᤠᤔᤠ<v>:ᤏᤠᤘᤠ          # unsure
ᤋᤠ᤹ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤋ{R}{do}{ng}  # unsure
ᤔᤠᤛᤡᤱᤔᤠ<v>:ᤔᤠᤛᤡᤱ{gs}
ᤁᤠᤶᤔᤠ<v>:ᤁᤠ{m}
ᤔᤡᤈᤠ᤹ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤔᤡᤈᤠ{gs}{rr}
ᤗᤧᤵᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤧ{gs}{rtl}{To}
ᤏᤠ᤺ᤰᤔᤠ<v>:ᤏᤠ{do}{k}{tnull}
ᤌᤢᤱᤔᤠ<v>:{th}{u}{ng}{snull}
ᤗᤠᤱᤄᤣ᤺ᤰᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤠᤱᤄᤣ{do}{gs}{kg}
ᤗᤠᤱᤄᤣᤁ᤻ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤠᤱᤄᤣᤁ{km}{gs}{kg}
ᤗᤧ᤺ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤗᤧ{do}
ᤛᤢᤰᤔᤠ<v>:ᤛᤢ{k}{tnull}
ᤜᤠ᤺ᤵᤔᤠ<v>:ᤜᤠ{do}
ᤗ᤹ᤔᤠ<vbdo>:ᤗ᤹
ᤔᤧᤵᤔᤠ<v>:ᤔᤧ{tp}{t}
ᤆᤡᤱᤔᤠ<v>:ᤆᤡ{ng}
ᤕᤠᤱᤔᤠ<v>:ᤕᤠ{ng}
ᤕᤢᤱᤔᤠ<v>:ᤕᤢ{ng}
ᤂᤥ᤺ᤔᤠ<v>:ᤂᤥ{do}
ᤐᤡᤔᤠ<v>:ᤐᤡ{rr}
ᤀᤠᤵᤔᤠ<v>:ᤀᤠ{B}

ALIAS Verb-Stems Verb2

LEXICON Noun-Stems
ᤐᤢ<n>:ᤐᤢ
ᤋᤱ<n>:ᤋᤱ
ᤀᤠᤶᤒᤣ<n>:ᤀᤠᤶᤒᤣ
ᤛᤠᤵᤗᤠ<n>:ᤛᤠᤵᤗᤠ
ᤖᤠᤔ᤻<n>:ᤖᤠᤔ᤻ # Dir/LR
ᤏᤠᤰ<n>:ᤏᤠ{k}
ᤔᤣᤴᤇᤠ<n>:ᤔᤣᤴᤇᤠ
ᤗᤠᤶᤛ᤹<n>:ᤗᤠᤶᤛ᤹
ᤏᤠᤵᤔᤡ<n>:ᤏᤠᤵᤔᤡ
ᤂᤩᤠ<n>:ᤂᤩᤠ
ᤀᤕᤰᤐᤠ<n>:ᤀᤕᤰ>ᤐ{Aabs}
ᤁᤖᤁᤘᤠ<n>:ᤁᤖᤁᤘᤠ
ᤔᤠ<n>:ᤔ{A}
ᤐᤠ<n>:ᤐ{A}
ᤐᤡᤋ<n>:ᤐᤡᤋ
ᤀᤡᤗᤠᤶ<n>:ᤀᤡᤗᤠ{m}
ᤛᤣᤒᤠ<n>:ᤛᤣᤒᤠ
ᤆᤢᤶ<n>:{ch}{u}{m}
ᤋᤣ᤺ᤱ<n>:ᤋᤣ᤺{ng}
ᤋᤣᤅ᤻<n>:ᤋᤣᤅ᤻ # Dir/LR
ᤁᤠᤌᤔᤠᤴᤍᤢ<n>:ᤁᤠᤌᤔᤠᤴᤍᤢ
ᤐᤩᤠᤱᤛᤡ<n>:ᤐᤩᤠᤱᤛᤡ
ᤕᤠᤰᤌᤢᤱ<n>:ᤕᤠᤰᤌᤢ{ng}
ᤕᤠ᤹<n>:ᤕᤠ᤹
ᤆᤱ<n>:ᤆ{ng}
ᤕᤠᤰᤌᤢᤶᤒᤠ<n>:ᤕᤠᤰᤌᤢᤶ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤐᤧᤏᤡ<n>:ᤐᤧᤏ{i}
ᤕᤠᤖᤡᤰ<n>:ᤕᤠᤖᤡ{k}
ᤒᤡᤆᤠᤖ<n>:ᤒᤡᤆᤠᤖ
ᤐᤠᤴ<n>:ᤐᤠ{do}{N}
ᤐᤠᤏ᤻<n>:ᤐᤠ{do}{N}  # Dir/LR
ᤔᤧᤴᤆᤡᤀᤠ<n>:ᤔᤧᤴᤆᤡᤀᤠ
ᤔᤏᤠ<n>:ᤔᤏᤠ{do}
ᤏᤠᤖᤠ<n>:ᤏᤠᤖᤠ
ᤛᤥᤖ<n>:ᤛᤥᤖ
ᤀ᤹ᤍ᤺ᤱ<n>:ᤀ᤹ᤍ᤺{ng}
ᤏᤢ<n>:ᤏᤢ
ᤁᤢᤶᤔᤠ<n>:ᤁᤢᤶᤔ{A}
ᤁᤏᤠᤶ<n>:ᤁᤏᤠ{m}
ᤁᤰ<n>:ᤁ{k}
ᤁᤰᤁᤓᤡᤰᤏᤠ<n>:ᤁᤰᤁᤓᤡᤰᤏ{A}
ᤁᤰᤑᤠ<n>:ᤁᤰᤑ{A}
ᤁᤰᤑᤣ᤹<n>:ᤁᤰᤑᤣ᤹
ᤁᤰᤗᤠ<n>:ᤁᤰᤗ{A}
ᤁᤰᤗᤡᤰᤔᤢᤕᤠ<n>:ᤁᤰᤗᤡᤰᤔᤢᤕ{A}
ᤁᤰᤗᤡᤰᤘᤠ<n>:ᤁᤰᤗᤡᤰᤘ{A}
ᤁᤰᤗᤡᤎᤡ᤺ᤶᤒᤠ<n>:ᤁᤰᤗᤡᤎᤡ᤺ᤶᤒ{A}
ᤁᤰᤗᤡᤎᤡᤔ᤻ᤒᤠ<n>:ᤁᤰᤗᤡᤎᤡᤔ᤻ᤒ{A}  # Dir/LR
ᤁᤰᤗᤧᤰᤂᤣ<n>:ᤁᤰᤗᤧᤰᤂᤣ
ᤋᤖ᤺ᤱ<n>:ᤋᤖ᤺{ng}
ᤋᤖᤅ᤻<n>:ᤋᤖ{ng}{km}    # Dir/LR
ᤋᤠᤱᤛᤠᤱ<n>:ᤋᤠᤱᤛᤠ{ng}
ᤀᤡᤰᤛᤠᤍᤡᤱ<n>:ᤀᤡᤰᤛᤠᤍᤡ{ng}
ᤀᤡᤰᤛᤠ<n>:ᤀᤡᤰᤛ{A}
ᤂᤠᤶᤒᤣ᤺ᤰ<n>:ᤂᤠᤶᤒᤣ᤺{k}
ᤆᤀᤡ᤺ᤳ<n>:ᤆᤀᤡ{do}{t}
ᤏᤠᤘᤠ<n>:ᤏᤠᤘ{A}
ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹<n>:ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ{gs}
ᤕᤠ᤺ᤶᤒᤰ<n>:ᤕᤠ᤺ᤶᤒ{k}
ᤕᤠᤔ᤻ᤒᤰ<n>:ᤕᤠᤔ᤻ᤒ{k}       # Dir/LR
ᤜᤠᤱ<n>:ᤜᤠ{ng}
ᤜᤠᤱ<n>:ᤜᤠ{ng}{ng}      # Dir/LR
ᤔᤧᤴᤇᤠᤶ<n>:ᤔᤧᤴᤇᤠ{m}
ᤀᤡᤛᤪᤠᤀᤡᤗᤒᤠ<n>:ᤀᤡᤛᤪᤠᤀᤡᤗ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤁᤠᤰ<n>:ᤁᤠ{k}
ᤕᤠᤵᤔᤡ<n>:ᤕᤠᤵᤔᤡ
ᤐᤥᤱ<n>:ᤐᤥ{do}{ng}{gs}
ᤔᤠᤱᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤐᤠᤴ<n>:ᤔᤠᤱᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹>ᤐᤠ{N}
ᤔᤠᤱᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤒᤠ<n>:ᤔᤠᤱᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤛᤡᤍᤢᤱᤈᤓᤠ<n>:ᤛᤡᤍᤢᤱᤈᤓ{A}
ᤛᤡᤍᤢᤱᤆᤓᤠ<n>:ᤛᤡᤍᤢᤱᤆᤓ{A}
ᤋᤢᤰᤂᤣ<n>:ᤋᤢᤰᤂᤣ
ᤗᤧᤴᤍᤡᤰ<n>:ᤗᤧᤴᤍᤡ{k}{do}
ᤗᤧᤴᤍᤡᤁ᤻<n>:ᤗᤧᤴᤍᤡᤁ{km}
ᤗᤧᤴ<n>:ᤗᤧ{N}
ᤛᤧᤴᤍᤡᤰ<n>:ᤛᤧᤴᤍᤡ{k}{do}
ᤛᤧᤴᤍᤡᤁ᤻<n>:ᤛᤧᤴᤍᤡᤁ{km}
ᤛᤧᤴ<n>:ᤛᤧ{N}
ᤍᤠᤱᤒᤠ<n>:ᤍᤠᤱ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤗᤢᤱᤔᤠ᤹<n>:ᤗᤢᤱᤔᤠ᤹
ᤗᤠᤈᤣ᤹<n>:ᤗᤠᤈᤣ᤹
ᤏᤛᤠᤴ<n>:ᤏᤛᤠ{do}{N}
ᤏᤛᤠᤏ᤻<n>:ᤏᤛᤠᤏ{km}
ᤁᤢᤈᤠ<n>:ᤁᤢᤈ{A}
ᤛᤧᤘᤠ<n>:ᤛᤧᤘ{A}
ᤛᤣᤛᤣ<n>:ᤛᤣᤛᤣ
ᤀᤡᤱᤈᤠᤱ<n>:ᤀᤡᤱᤈᤠ{ng}
ᤔᤢᤰᤛᤠᤶᤍᤠᤱᤒᤠ<n>:ᤔᤢᤰᤛᤠᤶ>ᤍᤠᤱ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤋᤠᤵᤑᤧ᤺ᤶᤒᤠ<n>:ᤋᤠᤵᤑᤧ᤺ᤶ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤐᤣᤗᤡ<n>:ᤐᤣᤗ{I}
ᤌᤱ<n>:ᤌ{ng}
ᤕᤠ᤺ᤶᤒᤣ<n>:ᤕᤠ᤺ᤶᤒᤣ
ᤕᤠᤶᤒᤣ<n>:ᤕᤠᤶᤒᤣ
ᤛᤡ<n>:ᤛᤡ         # "wheat"
ᤂᤖᤧᤴ<n>:ᤂᤖᤧ{N}   # "bread"


# names of god
ᤀᤸᤗᤧᤰᤂᤠ<n>:ᤀᤸᤗᤧᤰᤂᤠ
ᤀᤸᤗᤧᤰᤂᤠᤔᤠᤱ<n>:ᤀᤸᤗᤧᤰᤂᤠᤔᤠ{ng}
ᤀᤠᤗᤧᤰᤂᤠᤔᤠᤱ<n>:ᤀᤠᤗᤧᤰᤂᤠᤔᤠ{ng}
ᤋᤥᤗᤡᤱᤛᤥᤔᤢ<n>:ᤋᤥᤗᤡᤱᤛᤥᤔᤢ
ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤑᤢᤔᤠ<n>:ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤑᤢᤔ{A}
ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤑᤢ<n>:ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤑᤢ
ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤑᤢᤔᤠᤱ<n>:ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤑᤢᤔᤠ{ng}
ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤑᤢᤔᤠᤱ<n>:ᤏᤡᤱᤘᤠ᤹ᤑᤢᤔᤠ{ng}{ng}   # Dir/LR
ᤆᤠ᤺ᤔᤠᤱ<n>:ᤆᤠ᤺ᤔᤠ{ng}
ᤕᤜᤘᤣ<n>:ᤕᤜᤘᤣ
ᤕᤧᤛᤢ<n>:ᤕᤧᤛᤢ

# time Words
ᤐᤡᤴᤆᤧᤵ<n>:ᤐᤡᤴᤆᤧ{p}
ᤐᤣᤔᤢᤰ<n>:ᤐᤣ>ᤔᤢ{k}
ᤁᤢᤔᤢᤰ<n>:ᤁᤢ>ᤔᤢ{k}
ᤕᤧᤴ<n>:ᤕᤧ{N}
ᤕᤧᤴᤃᤠᤵ<n>:ᤕᤧᤴ>ᤃᤠ{p}
ᤗᤠ<n>:ᤗ{A}
ᤋᤱᤒᤣ<n>:ᤋᤱᤒᤣ

# days of the week
ᤋᤧᤏᤧᤒᤠ<n>:ᤋᤧᤏᤧ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤑᤥᤖᤠᤒᤠ<n>:ᤑᤥᤖᤠ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤔᤡᤰᤜᤠᤱᤒᤠ<n>:ᤔᤡᤰᤜᤠᤱ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤂᤣᤰᤛᤢᤒᤠ<n>:ᤂᤣᤰᤛᤢ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤁᤢᤖᤢᤵᤐᤠ<n>:ᤁᤢᤖᤢᤵ>ᤐ{Aabs}
ᤑᤛᤢᤵᤐᤠ<n>:ᤑᤛᤢᤵ>ᤐ{Aabs}
ᤛᤧᤴᤇᤪᤧᤱᤒᤠ<n>:ᤛᤧᤴᤇᤪᤧᤱ>ᤒ{Aabs}

# seasons
ᤜᤠᤱᤘᤠ᤺ᤶᤔᤠ<n>:ᤜᤠᤱ>ᤘᤠ᤺ᤶᤔ{A}
ᤋᤱᤘᤠ᤺ᤶᤔᤠ<n>:ᤋᤱ>ᤘᤠ᤺ᤶᤔ{A}
ᤆᤢᤱᤘᤠ᤺ᤶᤔᤠ<n>:ᤆᤢᤱ>ᤘᤠ᤺ᤶᤔ{A}
ᤑᤢᤱᤘᤠ᤺ᤶᤔᤠ<n>:ᤑᤢᤱ>ᤘᤠ᤺ᤶᤔ{A}

# months
ᤁ᤺ᤰᤑᤧᤰᤘᤠ<n>:ᤁ᤺ᤰ>ᤑᤧᤰᤘ{A}
ᤛ᤺ᤵᤑᤧᤰᤘᤠ<n>:ᤛ᤺ᤵ>ᤑᤧᤰᤘ{A}
ᤆᤧᤖᤧᤱᤏᤠᤶ<n>:ᤆᤧ>ᤖᤧᤱᤏᤠ{m}
ᤌᤧᤖᤧᤱᤏᤠᤶ<n>:ᤌᤧ>ᤖᤧᤱᤏᤠ{m}
ᤁᤠᤵᤔᤣ᤺ᤵᤐᤠ<n>:ᤁᤠᤵ>ᤔᤣ᤺ᤵᤐ{A}
ᤌᤰᤔᤣ᤺ᤵᤐᤠ<n>:ᤌᤰ>ᤔᤣ᤺ᤵᤐ{A}
ᤛᤡᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤐᤠ<n>:ᤛᤡ>ᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤐ{A}
ᤌᤧᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤐᤠ<n>:ᤌᤧ>ᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤐ{A}
ᤛᤡᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤖᤥ<n>:ᤛᤡ>ᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤖ{oo}
ᤌᤧᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤁᤪᤥ<n>:ᤌᤧ>ᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤁᤪ{oo}
ᤛᤧᤴᤇᤧᤱᤗᤠ<n>:ᤛᤧᤴᤇᤧᤱ>ᤗ{A}
ᤛᤡᤛᤣ᤺ᤰᤗᤠ<n>:ᤛᤡᤛᤣ᤺ᤰ>ᤗ{A}

# math signs
ᤛᤢᤶᤔᤠ<n>:ᤛᤢᤶᤔᤠ{A}
ᤆᤰᤔᤠ<n>:ᤆᤰᤔ{A}
ᤂᤰᤔᤠ<n>:ᤂᤰᤔ{A}
ᤑᤡ᤹<n>:ᤑᤡ᤹
ᤑᤥᤔᤠ<n>:ᤑᤥᤔ{A}
ᤌᤡᤶᤔᤠ<n>:ᤌᤡᤶᤔ{A}
ᤜᤠ᤺ᤔᤠ<n>:ᤜᤠ᤺ᤔ{A}
ᤜᤠ᤺<n>:ᤜ{A}{do}
ᤐᤡᤆᤧᤵ<n>:ᤐᤡᤆᤧ{p}
ᤋᤱᤍᤱ<n>:ᤋᤱᤍ{ng}

# proper Nouns
ᤖᤠ᤺ᤶ<np>:ᤖᤠ᤺{m}
ᤏᤣᤐᤠᤸ<np><top>:ᤏᤣᤐᤠ{ll}
ᤑᤥᤃᤡᤍᤥ<np><top>:ᤑᤥᤃᤡᤍᤥ
ᤁᤖᤍ<np>:ᤁᤖᤍ
ᤌᤧᤈᤱᤒᤥ<np><top>:ᤌᤧᤈᤱᤒ{oo}
ᤌᤱᤗᤱ<np><top>:ᤌᤱᤗ{ng}
ᤗᤡᤱᤎᤧᤵ<np><top>:ᤗᤡᤱᤎᤧ{p}
ᤂᤰᤗᤡᤱ<np><top>:ᤂᤰᤗᤡ{ng}

# biblical proper nouns
ᤋᤣᤖᤜ<np>:ᤋᤣᤖᤜ
ᤀᤒᤪᤠᤔ<np>:ᤀᤒᤪᤠᤔ
ᤏᤠᤜᤥᤖ<np>:ᤏᤠᤜᤥᤖ
ᤜᤠᤖᤠᤏ<np>:ᤜᤠᤖᤠᤏ
ᤗᤢᤳ<np>:ᤗᤢ{t}
ᤀᤢᤖ<np><top>:ᤀᤢᤖ
ᤁᤸᤍᤡᤜᤠ᤹<np>:ᤁᤸᤍᤡᤜᤠ᤹
ᤛᤠᤖᤠᤀᤡ<np>:ᤛᤠᤖᤠᤀᤡ
ᤔᤡᤸᤁᤠ<np>:ᤔᤡᤸᤁᤠ
ᤕᤡᤛ᤻ᤁᤠ<np>:ᤕᤡᤛ᤻ᤁᤠ
ᤁᤏᤠᤏ<np><top>:ᤁᤏᤠᤏ
ᤜᤠᤖᤠᤴ<np>:ᤜᤠᤖᤠ{N}
ᤜᤠᤖᤠᤴ<np>:ᤜᤠᤖᤠ{N}{N}   # Dir/LR
ᤛᤣᤶ<np>:ᤛᤣ{m}
ᤛᤠᤔᤢᤀᤣᤗ<np>:ᤛᤠᤔᤢᤀᤣᤗ
ᤛᤠᤘᤗ<np>:ᤛᤠᤘᤗ
ᤒᤣᤌᤗᤧᤜᤧᤔᤒᤠ<np><m><top>:ᤒᤣᤌᤗᤧᤜᤧᤔ>ᤒ{Aabs}
ᤒᤣᤌᤗᤧᤜᤧᤔ<np><top>:ᤒᤣᤌᤗᤧᤜᤧᤔ
ᤍᤠᤀᤢᤍ<np>:ᤍᤠᤀᤢᤍ
ᤔᤥᤛᤠ<np>:ᤔᤥᤛ{A}
ᤑᤠᤖᤥ<np>:ᤑᤠᤖᤥ
ᤏᤒᤢᤁᤍᤏᤣᤛᤖ<np>:ᤏᤒᤢᤁᤍᤏᤣᤛᤖ
ᤒᤣᤒᤡᤗᤥᤏ<np><top>:ᤒᤣᤒᤡᤗᤥᤏ
ᤗᤠᤶᤗᤥᤒᤠᤜᤠ᤹—ᤕᤖᤢᤒᤠᤒᤣᤗ<np>:ᤗᤠᤶᤗᤥᤒᤠᤜᤠ᤹—ᤕᤖᤢᤒᤠᤒᤣᤗ
ᤕᤣᤛᤢᤀᤠ<np>:ᤕᤣᤛᤢᤀᤠ
ᤏᤜᤧᤔᤩᤠ<np>:ᤏᤜᤧᤔᤩᤠ
ᤛᤖᤠᤕᤠᤜ<np>:ᤛᤖᤠᤕᤠᤜ
ᤖᤣᤗᤕᤠᤜ<np>:ᤖᤣᤗᤕᤠᤜ
ᤔᤥᤷᤍᤁᤤ<np>:ᤔᤥᤷᤍᤁᤤ
ᤒᤡᤸᤛᤠᤏ<np>:ᤒᤡᤸᤛᤠᤏ
ᤔᤡᤛ᤻ᤐᤠᤖ<np>:ᤔᤡᤛ᤻ᤐᤠᤖ
ᤒᤡᤃᤫᤤ<np>:ᤒᤡᤃᤫᤤ
ᤖᤣᤜᤢᤔ<np>:ᤖᤣᤜᤢᤔ
ᤒᤠᤏᤠᤜᤠ<np>:ᤒᤠᤏᤠᤜᤠ
ᤐᤖᤥᤛ<np>:ᤐᤖᤥᤛ
ᤛᤐᤋᤩᤠᤜ<np>:ᤛᤐᤋᤩᤠᤜ
ᤀᤠᤖᤠ<np>:ᤀᤠᤖᤠ
ᤐᤜᤋ-ᤔᤥᤀᤠᤒ<np>:ᤐᤜᤋ-ᤔᤥᤀᤠᤒ
ᤕᤥᤀᤠᤒ<np>:ᤕᤥᤀᤠᤒ
ᤀᤣᤗᤠᤔ<np><top>:ᤀᤣᤗᤠᤔ
ᤈᤳᤋᤢ<np>:ᤈᤳᤋᤢ
ᤈᤰᤁᤤ<np>:ᤈᤰᤁᤤ
ᤒᤠᤏᤡ<np>:ᤒᤠᤏᤡ
ᤒᤣᤒᤤ<np>:ᤒᤣᤒᤤ
ᤀᤈ᤻ᤃᤠᤍ<np>:ᤀᤈ᤻ᤃᤠᤍ
ᤀᤍᤥᤏᤡᤁᤠᤔ<np>:ᤀᤍᤥᤏᤡᤁᤠᤔ
ᤀᤠᤍᤡᤏ<np>:ᤀᤠᤍᤡᤏ
ᤀᤠᤋᤣᤖ<np>:ᤀᤠᤋᤣᤖ
ᤜᤡᤈᤁᤡᤕᤠ<np>:ᤜᤡᤈᤁᤡᤕ{A}
ᤒᤣᤈᤤ<np>:ᤒᤣᤈᤤ
ᤕᤥᤖᤠ<np>:ᤕᤥᤖ{A}
ᤜᤠᤛᤢᤔ<np>:ᤜᤠᤛᤢᤔ
ᤃᤡᤒ᤻ᤒᤠᤖ<np>:ᤃᤡᤒ᤻ᤒᤠᤖ
ᤏᤋᤥᤐᤠ<np>:ᤏᤋᤥᤐ{A}
ᤀᤒᤪᤠᤜᤠᤶ<np>:ᤀᤒᤪᤠᤜᤠ{m}
ᤀᤒᤪᤠᤜᤠᤶ<np>:ᤀᤒᤪᤠᤜᤠ{m}{m}   # Dir/LR
ᤛᤠᤖᤠ<np>:ᤛᤠᤖ{A}
ᤔᤡᤛᤪ<np><top>:ᤔᤡᤛᤪ
ᤔᤡᤛᤪᤡ<np>:ᤔᤡᤛᤪᤡ
ᤀᤠᤍᤶ<np>:ᤀᤠᤍ{m}
ᤀᤠᤍᤶ<np>:ᤀᤠᤍ{m}{m}     # Dir/LR
ᤏᤢᤜ<np>:ᤏᤢᤜ
ᤀᤡᤛ᤻ᤔᤠᤀᤣᤗ<np>:ᤀᤡᤛ᤻ᤔᤠᤀᤣᤗ
ᤀᤡᤛᤪᤠᤀᤡᤗ<np><top>:ᤀᤡᤛᤪᤠᤀᤡᤗ
ᤀᤡᤛᤪᤠᤀᤡᤗᤡ<np>:ᤀᤡᤛᤪᤠᤀᤡᤗᤡ
ᤗᤠᤒᤠᤏ<np>:ᤗᤠᤒᤠ{N}
